Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB536.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Approved project" means a project for which the developer has:
1. Filed an application under subsection (6) of this section;
2. Negotiated the terms of housing incentive payments with a local
government; and
3. Commenced a housing development within a district;
(b) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(c) "Department" means the Department for Local Government;
(d) "Housing development district" or "district" means a contiguous
geographic area of not more than one thousand (1,000) acres, which may
be within one (1) or more cities or counties, defined and created for
development or revitalization purposes by an ordinance of a local
government in which one (1) or more projects are proposed to be located;
(e) "Local government" means a city, county, charter county government,
consolidated local government, urban-county government, or unified local
government;
(f) "New construction" means the planning, design, building, or any
combination of these, to erect a completely new structure never before
occupied within a district;
(g) "Program" means the Housing Incentive Payment Program provided for in
this section;
(h) "Project" means a housing development within a district that:
1. Contains at least fifteen (15) housing units, including multifamily and
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 1/27/2026 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 111
mixed-use housing; and
2. Meets the requirements set out in this section and any additional
requirements adopted by an ordinance of a local government;
(i) "Revitalization" means the planning or replanning, design or redesign,
acquisition, clearance, development, disposal, rehabilitation, historic
preservation, or any combination of these, of a structure within a district
and the preparation and use of the structure for residential purposes; and
(j) "Taxing authority" means a school district or a special purpose
governmental entity having ad valorem taxing authority and operating
within the jurisdiction of a local government that has established a district.
(2) (a) A local government may establish a housing development district by:
1. Adopting an ordinance containing:
a. A map and description of the area to be included within the
district;
b. A description of the process by which a developer may apply to
construct housing within the district;
c. A statement regarding whether development within the district
is:
i. Exempt from permitting or review by the planning unit; or
ii. Subject to an alternative process for permitting or review
except in no instance shall an alternative process be more
stringent than the procedure utilized outside of the district
for similar developments; and
d. Any additional requirements or qualifications that developers
must meet to be eligible for participation in the program; and
2. Notifying the cabinet and the department that a district has been
created and transmitting information as required in subsection (10) of
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 1/27/2026 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 111
this section.
(b) A developer may petition a local government to establish a district.
(c) A local government shall:
1. Exclude a parcel of property from a proposed district if the local
government receives a written request from a property owner seeking
exclusion within thirty (30) days of the adoption of an ordinance
under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
2. Amend the map and description of the district accordingly.
(3) (a) If a local government chooses to utilize the exemption to planning and
zoning or alternative process under subsection (2)(a)1.c. of this section, the
local government shall conduct a public hearing regarding the exemption
or alternative process, and a separate vote of the legislative body of the local
government shall be required to adopt the exemption or alternative process.
(b) The meeting shall be held solely for this purpose, and no other business
shall be conducted at the meeting.
(4) (a) Local governments may act jointly, via an interlocal agreement in
accordance with KRS 65.210 to 65.300, to establish a district.
(b) The interlocal agreement shall contain the information set out in subsection
(2) of this section, and each participating local government shall be
required to adopt an ordinance as set out in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) (a) In addition to a local government, any taxing authority may elect to
participate in the program by its board enacting a resolution declaring its
election to participate.
(b) If a taxing authority elects to participate under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the taxing authority shall proceed to negotiate with the
developer as described in subsection (6)(c) of this section.
(6) (a) Following the creation of a district, a local government may accept
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 1/27/2026 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 111
applications from developers for a project.
(b) A local government shall have the sole discretion to approve or deny an
application, but a local government shall not approve a project unless it
determines that the project will not commence unless the developer receives
the housing incentive payment set out in subsection (7) of this section.
(c) If a local government approves an application, it shall:
1. Negotiate with the developer to:
a. Determine a percentage of the property tax actually paid in any
year that will be used to calculate the housing incentive payment
described in subsection (7) of this section;
b. Set the duration of the housing incentive payments, not to exceed
the maximum terms set out in subsection (7) of this section;
c. Define when the project shall be considered to have commenced
for the purposes set out in subsection (7) of this section; and
d. Establish the timing for the housing incentive payments; and
2. After agreeing to the terms set out in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, transmit the application along with a document setting out
those terms to the cabinet and the department.
(d) An application under this subsection shall not be required for a developer
seeking to develop housing within a district if that developer is not seeking
to participate in the program. An application shall only be required if a
developer is seeking to participate in the program. This section shall not be
construed to permit a local government to prohibit a developer from
developing housing within the district that would otherwise be permissible
outside of the district or in the absence of the existence of a district.
(7) A Housing Incentive Payment Program shall be administered as follows:
(a) Participating local governments and participating taxing authorities shall
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 1/27/2026 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 111
each award a housing incentive payment to a developer of an approved
project on an annual basis for a period of up to:
1. Seven (7) years for a project involving new construction; or
2. Fifteen (15) years for a project solely involving revitalization of
structures;
beginning six (6) months from the commencement of the project as
determined under subsection (6)(c)1.c. of this section;
(b) The annual housing incentive payment from each participating local
government and taxing authority shall be calculated by first determining the
total property tax that was actually paid in the preceding year to each
participating local government and taxing authority for each parcel of
property included in an approved project which has been issued a certificate
of occupancy, and applying the percentage agreed to by the participating
local governments, other taxing authorities if applicable, and the developer
as set out in subparagraph (6)(c)1. of this section; and
(c) Any private or nonprofit entity may contribute money to a local government
to award as additional housing incentive payment amounts for a project
within a district.
(8) A local area development district shall, upon the request of a local government,
assist with the establishment of a district under this section and with the
administration of a program under subsection (7) of this section.
(9) (a) The cabinet shall develop and implement strategies and programs to
promote awareness of a program operating under this section among
businesses and employers it provides services to or conducts business with.
(b) When the cabinet engages with a company regarding participation in any
incentive or funding program administered by the cabinet, including when
it initially communicates with, receives an application from, and approves
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 1/27/2026 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 111
funding to, any company, it shall provide to the company information
regarding:
1. The program set out in this section, including a list of local
governments that have established districts and implemented programs
under this section; and
2. The Certified Child Care Community Designation Program under
KRS 199.891, including a list of communities that have obtained that
designation.
(c) The cabinet shall prepare and post a report to the website required in KRS
154.12-2035, on November 1 of each year, that contains a list of the local
governments that have established districts and implemented programs
under this section and a list of communities that have obtained the certified
child care community designation under KRS 199.891, and information
regarding the cabinet's engagement with companies including the total
number of contacts made under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(10) (a) When a local government establishes a district, and no later than each
September 1 thereafter, the local government shall transmit information to
the cabinet and the department including:
1. Whether the district has been established jointly with any other local
government, and if so which other local governments;
2. A map and description of the area included in the district;
3. The density of housing units per acre in the district;
4. The total number of developers that have applied for participation in
the program including the number approved and denied;
5. The total number of projects in the program;
6. For each approved project:
a. The name of the developer of the approved project;
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 1/27/2026 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 111
b. The total assessed value of property that is a part of the approved
project;
c. The total number of housing units that have been constructed in
connection with the approved project;
d. The total amount of housing incentive payments that have been
made in connection with the approved project;
e. The duration of the housing incentive payments that the local
government has agreed to make to the developer;
f. The identity of any other taxing authority that has participated in
the approved project and the total amount of housing incentive
payments issued from each taxing authority; and
g. The identity of any private or nonprofit entities that have
participated in the approved project and the total amount of
housing incentive payments from each entity;
7. A running total of the amount of funds all participating local
governments have expended on all approved projects within the
district;
8. A running total of the number of housing units constructed in the
district by a developer that has received housing incentive payments;
and
9. Whether the local government has obtained a certified child care
community designation.
(b) Beginning November 1, 2027, the department shall submit an annual report
to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue summarizing the information it
has received from local governments under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 1/27/2026 11:26 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 111
(c) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out this subsection, including the creation
of a standardized form to be used by local governments to submit
information.
(d) A local government shall not be required to submit any further information
on an approved project following the disbursement of the final housing
incentive payment associated with that project.
(11) This section shall not be construed to prohibit or preempt a local government
from adopting any other ordinance or regulation or establishing any other
program, including an incentive program, concerning housing development.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 1/27/2026 11:26 AM Jacketed